Missouri, session 2026, SB1095.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.127, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 115.127,
to read as follows:
115.127. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of
this section, upon receipt of notice of a special election
to fill a vacancy submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of
section 115.125, the election authority shall cause legal
notice of the special election to be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in its jurisdiction. The
notice shall include the name of the officer or agency
calling the election, the date and time of the election, the
name of the office to be filled and the date by which
candidates must be selected or filed for the office. Within
one week prior to each special election to fill a vacancy
held in its jurisdiction, the election authority shall cause
legal notice of the election to be published in two
newspapers of different political faith and general
circulation in the jurisdiction. The legal notice shall
include the date and time of the election, the name of the
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1095 2
If there is only one newspaper of general circulation in the
jurisdiction, the notice shall be published in the newspaper
within one week prior to the election. If there are two or
more newspapers of general circulation in the jurisdiction,
but no two of opposite political faith, the notice shall be
published in any two of the newspapers within one week prior
to the election.
2. Except as provided in subsections 1 and 4 of this
section and in sections 115.521, 115.549 and 115.593, the
election authority shall cause legal notice of each election
held in its jurisdiction to be published. The notice shall
be published in two newspapers of different political faith
and qualified pursuant to chapter 493 which are published
within the bounds of the area holding the election. If
there is only one so-qualified newspaper, then notice shall
be published in only one newspaper. If there is no
newspaper published within the bounds of the election area,
then the notice shall be published in two qualified
newspapers of different political faith serving the area.
Notice shall be published twice, the first publication
occurring in the second week prior to the election, and the
second publication occurring within one week prior to the
election. Each such legal notice shall include the date and
time of the election, the name of the officer or agency
calling the election and a sample ballot; and, unless notice
has been given as provided by section 115.129, the second
publication of notice of the election shall include the
location of polling places. The election authority may
provide any additional notice of the election it deems
desirable.
3. The election authority shall print the official
ballot as the same appears on the sample ballot, and no

SB 1095 3
candidate's name or ballot issue which appears on the sample
ballot or official printed ballot shall be stricken or
removed from the ballot except on death of a candidate or by
court order, but in no event shall a candidate or issue be
stricken or removed from the ballot less than eight weeks
before the date of the election.
4. In lieu of causing legal notice to be published in
accordance with any of the provisions of this chapter, the
election authority in jurisdictions which have less than
seven hundred fifty registered voters and in which no
newspaper qualified pursuant to chapter 493 is published,
may cause legal notice to be mailed during the second week
prior to the election, by first class mail, to each
registered voter at the voter's voting address. All such
legal notices shall include the date and time of the
election, the location of the polling place, the name of the
officer or agency calling the election and a sample ballot.
5. If the opening date for filing a declaration of
candidacy for any office in a political subdivision or
special district is not required by law or charter, the
opening filing date shall be 8:00 a.m., the [seventeenth]
sixteenth Tuesday prior to the election. If the closing
date for filing a declaration of candidacy for any office in
a political subdivision or special district is not required
by law or charter, the closing filing date shall be 5:00
p.m., the [fourteenth] thirteenth Tuesday prior to the
election or, if the thirteenth Tuesday prior to the election
is a state or federal holiday, the closing filing date shall
be 5:00 p.m. on the next day that is not a state or federal
holiday. The political subdivision or special district
calling an election shall, before the [seventeenth]
sixteenth Tuesday[,] prior to any election at which offices

SB 1095 4
are to be filled, notify the general public of the opening
filing date, the office or offices to be filled, the proper
place for filing and the closing filing date of the
election. Such notification may be accomplished by legal
notice published in at least one newspaper of general
circulation in the political subdivision or special district.
6. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and
115.359, if there is no additional cost for the printing or
reprinting of ballots or if the candidate agrees to pay any
printing or reprinting costs, a candidate who has filed for
an office or who has been duly nominated for an office may,
at any time after the certification of the notice of
election required in subsection 1 of section 115.125 but no
later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
election, withdraw as a candidate pursuant to a court order,
which, except for good cause shown by the election authority
in opposition thereto, shall be freely given upon
application by the candidate to the circuit court of the
100 area of such candidate's residence.
✓